New York, session 2025-2026, S9665.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 19 2 to read as follows: 3 § 19. Foreign adversary acquisition or transfer of agricultural land. 4 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 5 following meanings: 6 (a) "agricultural land" means real estate used for an agricultural 7 operation in the state. 8 (b) "agricultural operation" means any operation devoted to the bona 9 fide production of crops, animals, or fowl, including the production of 10 fruits and vegetables of any kind; meat, dairy, and poultry products; 11 nuts, tobacco, nursery, and floral products; and the production and 12 harvest of products from silvicultural activity; 13 (c) "controlling interest" means either possession of more than fifty 14 percent of the ownership interests in an entity or a percentage owner- 15 ship in an entity of fifty percent or less if such owner directs the 16 business and affairs of such entity without the requirement or consent 17 of any other party; 18 (d) "department" means the department of agriculture and markets; 19 (e) "foreign adversary" means any foreign government or nongovernment 20 person determined by the United States secretary of commerce to have 21 engaged in a long-term pattern or serious instances of conduct signif- 22 icantly adverse to the national security of the United States or the 23 security and safety of United States persons; 24 (f) "interest" means any estate, remainder, or reversion, or portion 25 of the estate, remainder, or reversion, or an option pursuant to which 26 one party has a right to cause legal or equitable title to agricultural 27 land to be transferred. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06665-01-5 S. 9665 2 1 2. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after Janu- 2 ary first, two thousand twenty-six, no foreign adversary shall acquire 3 or transfer any interest in agricultural land in the state of New York. 4 (b) This section shall not apply to (i) any interest in agricultural 5 land held by a foreign adversary prior to January first, two thousand 6 twenty-six, or (ii) any federally recognized Indian tribe or its govern- 7 ment units and enterprises. 8 (c) Any transfer of an interest in land in violation of this section 9 shall be void. 10 (d) This section shall not be applied in a manner inconsistent with 11 any provision of any treaty between the United States and another coun- 12 try. 13 3. (a) Based on the reports submitted to it pursuant to the federal 14 Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act, 7 U.S.C. § 3501 et seq., 15 and other information the department, at its discretion, deems appropri- 16 ate, the department shall compile an annual report in consultation with 17 the appropriate state agencies and boards for each calendar year 18 containing all of the following, if available: 19 (i) the total amount of agricultural land that is under foreign owner- 20 ship; 21 (ii) the percentage change in foreign ownership of agricultural land 22 in the state for each year over the prior ten years; 23 (iii) the purpose for which foreign-owned agricultural land in the 24 state is being used currently. To the extent such information is avail- 25 able, the department shall also include any significant recent changes 26 or trends in the uses of foreign-owned agricultural land in the state; 27 (iv) with the assistance of relevant state agencies, information 28 regarding the extent of, and any recent changes in, foreign ownership of 29 energy production, storage, or distribution facilities in the state to 30 the extent such information is available; and 31 (v) any legislative, regulatory, or administrative policy changes the 32 department recommends in light of the information in this report. 33 (b) The department shall publish its inaugural report no later than 34 July first, two thousand twenty-six and each subsequent report no later 35 than July first of each year. The department shall also deliver copies 36 of such report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate 37 and the speaker of the assembly. 38 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.